Tennessee, session 114, SB1385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 29, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each medical laboratory shall have a medical laboratory supervisor readily
available for consultations during all hours when tests are performed.
(b) A medical laboratory shall not require a medical laboratory supervisor to be
on laboratory premises.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1385
001881
- 1 -